Alabama, session 2026rs, HB124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
27 Section 1. Sections 16-5-50, 16-5-51, 16-5-52, 16-5-53,
28 16-5-54, 16-5-54.1, 16-5-55, and 16-5-56 of the Code of
Page 1

16-5-54, 16-5-54.1, 16-5-55, and 16-5-56 of the Code of
HB124 Enrolled
29 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
30 "§16-5-50
31 The Alabama Math and Science Teacher Education Program
32 is created pursuant to this article is renamed the Loan
33 Assistance in Support of Educators in Alabama (LASEA)
34 Program."
35 "§16-5-51
36 The purpose of the Alabama Math and Science Teacher
37 Education Program Loan Assistance in Support of Educators in
38 Alabama Program is twofold as follows:
39 (1) To encourage individuals to enroll in and complete
40 educator programs leading to identified as having acute
41 educator shortages and obtain Alabama certification in
42 mathematics, science, or computer science those programs.
43 (2) To improve the educational system in Alabama by
44 encouraging those who complete the program and obtain
45 certification in acute educator shortage programs to accept
46 math, science, or computer science teaching educator positions
47 in Alabama public K-12 schools, preferably in public or school
48 systems, including charter schools, where the shortage of
49 math, science, or computer science teachers, or any
50 combination of the three, is most acute, or in a school that
51 has been designated as a failing school, or any other term
52 adopted to identify an underperforming school, by the State
53 Board of Education or the Legislature that have been
54 identified as acute educator shortage locations."
55 "§16-5-52
56 For the purposes of this article, the following terms
Page 2

For the purposes of this article, the following terms
HB124 Enrolled
57 shall have the following meanings:
58 (1) ACUTE EDUCATOR SHORTAGE. A shortage of certified
59 educators in identified educator programs as determined by the
60 Alabama Commission on Higher Education in consultation with
61 the State Department of Education and the Alabama Commission
62 on the Evaluation of Services.
63 (2) ACUTE EDUCATOR SHORTAGE LOCATION. A public K-12
64 school or school system that has been identified as having an
65 acute educator shortage.
66 (1)(3) APPROVED INSTITUTION. A state-supported
67 institution of higher education or a private nonprofit
68 institution of higher education that satisfies all of the
69 following:
70 a. Is accredited by the Southern Association of
71 Colleges and Schools Commission on Colleges.
72 b. Is approved by the State Board of Education to
73 prepare teachers of middle level or secondary math, science,
74 or computer science educators in programs identified as having
75 an acute educator shortage.
76 c. Is eligible to receive Title IV federal student aid
77 program funds.
78 d. Maintains its primary headquarters in Alabama.
79 (4) BASE SUPPORT. Loan assistance in support of
80 educators who are certified in a program identified as having
81 an acute educator shortage pursuant to Section 16-5-54.
82 (2)(5) CHARTER SCHOOL. A form of public K-12 school. A
83 teacher established pursuant to Chapter 6F. An educator
84 employed by a charter school accredited by the Southern
Page 3

employed by a charter school accredited by the Southern
HB124 Enrolled
85 Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on Colleges is
86 eligible to participate in the program. A teacher for the base
87 support provided in this article. An educator employed by a
88 charter school is not eligible for the acute shortage area
89 supplement supplemental support provided in this article.
90 (3)(6) COMMISSION. The Alabama Commission on Higher
91 Education.
92 (7) EDUCATOR. A full-time employee of a public K-12
93 school or school system whose function is to work with
94 students in support of their efforts to learn and obtain an
95 education.
96 (4)(8) ELIGIBLE APPLICANT. A person An individual who
97 satisfies the criteria set out in this article and is eligible
98 under rules adopted by the commission.
99 (5)(9) PROGRAM. The Alabama Math and Science Teacher
100 Education Program Loan Assistance in Support of Educators in
101 Alabama Program created by this article and administered by
102 the commission that provides loan repayments assistance to a
103 teacher an educator with a valid Alabama professional educator
104 certificate who is endorsed in math, science, or computer
105 science who teaches math, science, or computer science courses
106 for which the teacher is properly certified for three-fourths
107 of the full-time teaching load in the Alabama public school
108 system a program identified as having an acute educator
109 shortage.
110 (6) SCIENCE. Biology, chemistry, physics, and general
111 science.
112 (10) SUPPLEMENTAL SUPPORT. Loan assistance in support
Page 4

(10) SUPPLEMENTAL SUPPORT. Loan assistance in support
HB124 Enrolled
113 of educators who qualify for base support pursuant to Section
114 16-5-54 and are employed in an acute educator shortage
115 location.
116 (7)(11) YEAR. A school year that shall be divided into
117 The fall and spring semesters. The term does not mean
118 calendar, fiscal, or scholastic year of an academic year of a
119 public K-12 school or school system."
120 "§16-5-53
121 (a) The Alabama Math and Science Teacher Education
122 Program program shall be administered by the commission, which
123 may adopt any rules necessary for the administration of the
124 program.
125 (b) A percentage of any annual appropriations received
126 by the program, not to exceed 10 percent, may be expended for
127 its operation and maintenance. Any funds appropriated to the
128 program shall be non-reverting at the end of each fiscal year.
129 (c) The determination of acute educator shortages and
130 acute educator shortage locations shall be made at least once
131 every academic year."
132 "§16-5-54
133 (a) The program shall provide two levels of payment for
134 loan assistance: (i) base support in the amount of seven
135 thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per year worked or
136 three thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($3,750) per
137 semester, for a maximum of four consecutive years, and (ii)
138 supplemental support in the amount of three thousand dollars
139 ($3,000) per year worked or one thousand five hundred dollars
140 ($1,500) per semester worked, for a maximum of four
Page 5

($1,500) per semester worked, for a maximum of four
HB124 Enrolled
141 consecutive years. Depending on eligibility, an eligible
142 applicant may receive the base support or both the base
143 support and supplemental support.
144 (b) To be eligible for the base program of three
145 thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($3,750) per semester for
146 math and science teachers and one thousand five hundred
147 dollars ($1,500) per semester for computer science teachers,
148 an support an eligible applicant shall satisfy all of the
149 following:
150 (1) Is a citizen or a lawful permanent resident of the
151 United States.
152 (2) Is a resident of Alabama. The commission shall
153 accept any one of the following as proof of residency:
154 a. A current valid Alabama driver license.
155 b. A current valid Alabama vehicle registration.
156 c. A current valid Alabama voter registration card.
157 (1) Be(3) Is a graduate of a State Board of Education
158 an approved program in math, science, or computer science, at
159 the baccalaureate or master's level after the 2018 spring
160 semester term from an approved Alabama institution and hold an
161 initial middle level or secondary professional educator
162 certificate endorsed in math, science, or computer science
163 that was has been issued an Alabama educator certificate based
164 upon completion of the approved program in math, science, or
165 computer science. A teacher identified as having an acute
166 educator shortage. An educator who only earns a passing score
167 on the Praxis test in math, science, or computer science to
168 add a certificate endorsement for math, science, or computer
Page 6

add a certificate endorsement for math, science, or computer
HB124 Enrolled
169 science, an approved program and who has not completed an
170 entire the approved program, does not satisfy this
171 requirement.
172 (2) Holds a valid Alabama professional educator
173 certificate endorsed in middle level or secondary math,
174 science, or computer science, or any combination of the three.
175 (3) Teaches
176 (4) Is employed by a public K-12 school or school
177 system.
178 (5) Maintains a schedule in which at least
179 three-fourths of the full-time teaching load is comprised of
180 math, science, or computer science in an Alabama public school
181 system workload addresses an acute educator shortage.
182 (4) Is a citizen or a lawful permanent resident of the
183 United States.
184 (5) Is a resident of Alabama and provides documentation
185 proving a permanent connection to the State of Alabama. The
186 commission shall accept any one of the following as proof of
187 residency:
188 a. A current valid Alabama driver license.
189 b. A current valid Alabama vehicle registration.
190 c. A current valid Alabama voter registration card.
191 (6) Has outstanding federal student loans, subsidized
192 or unsubsidized.
193 (7) Satisfies additional continuing eligibility
194 criteria established by the commission.
195 (b) In order to receive an additional supplement
196 pursuant to this article, in addition to the criteria listed
Page 7

pursuant to this article, in addition to the criteria listed
HB124 Enrolled
197 in subsection (a), a recipient shall also teach math, science,
198 or computer science, or any combination of the three, in a
199 public school system within the state with an acute teacher
200 shortage in math, science, or computer science, or any
201 combination of the three, for which the teacher is properly
202 certified, as identified by the commission in consultation
203 with the Alabama State Department of Education or in a school
204 that has been designated as a failing school, or any other
205 term adopted to identify an underperforming school, by the
206 Alabama State Board of Education or the Legislature.(c) To be
207 eligible for the supplemental support an eligible applicant
208 must meet the criteria listed in subsection (b) and also be
209 employed in an acute educator shortage location."
210 "§16-5-54.1
211 (a) Beginning in the fall semester of 2021, the
212 benefits outlined in subsection (a) of Section 16-5-54(a) and
213 the criteria outlined in Section 16-5-54(b) and (c) shall also
214 apply to the following eligible individuals, pending
215 authorization to teach who are authorized to be educators in
216 Alabama and subsequent employment are subsequently employed in
217 an Alabama public K-12 school: or school system, who graduated
218 from a regionally accredited college or university in another
219 state at the baccalaureate or master's level after the 2021
220 spring semester term, and who may or may not reside within
221 Alabama, exempting Section 16-5-54(b)(2).
222 (1) An individual who graduated from a regionally
223 accredited college or university in Alabama or in another
224 state who is certified to teach math, science, or computer
Page 8

state who is certified to teach math, science, or computer
HB124 Enrolled
225 science in another state, and who may or may not reside within
226 Alabama.
227 (2) An individual who resides in another state and is a
228 graduate of a State Board of Education approved program in
229 math, science, or computer science, at the baccalaureate or
230 master's level after the 2021 spring semester term from an
231 approved Alabama institution and who holds an initial
232 middle-level or secondary professional educator certificate
233 endorsed in math, science, or computer science that was issued
234 based upon completion of the approved program in math,
235 science, or computer science. A teacher who only earns a
236 passing score on the Praxis test in math, science, or computer
237 science to add a certificate endorsement for math, science, or
238 computer science and who has not completed an entire approved
239 program, does not satisfy this requirement.
240 (b) The individuals listed in subsection (a) shall also
241 satisfy all of the following criteria:
242 (1) Hold a valid Alabama professional educator
243 certificate endorsed in middle-level or secondary math,
244 science, or computer science, or any combination of the three.
245 (2) Teach a schedule in which at least three-fourths of
246 the full-time teaching load is comprised of math, science, or
247 computer science courses for which the teacher is properly
248 certified in an Alabama public school system.
249 (3) Be citizens or lawful permanent residents of the
250 United States.
251 (4) Have outstanding federal student loans, subsidized
252 or unsubsidized.
Page 9

or unsubsidized.
HB124 Enrolled
253 (5) Satisfy additional continuing eligibility criteria
254 established by the commission.
255 (c) In order to receive an additional supplement
256 pursuant to this article, in addition to the criteria listed
257 in subsections (a) and (b), a recipient shall also teach math,
258 science, or computer science courses, or any combination of
259 the three, for which he or she is properly certified, in a
260 school system within the state with an acute teacher shortage
261 in math, science, or computer science, or any combination of
262 the three, as identified by the commission in consultation
263 with the State Department of Education or in a school that has
264 been designated as a failing school, or any other term
265 subsequently adopted to identify underperforming schools, by
266 the State Board of Education or the Legislature."
267 "§16-5-55
268 (a) The program shall be used to provide a loan
269 repayment for federal student loans in the following amounts:
270 (1)a. Prior to the 2022 fall semester, five thousand
271 dollars ($5,000) per year, or two thousand five hundred
272 dollars ($2,500) per semester worked, for a maximum of four
273 consecutive years for a teacher with a valid Alabama
274 professional educator certificate endorsed in middle level or
275 secondary math or science who graduated from a teacher
276 education program at an approved institution after the 2018
277 spring semester term and is teaching in an Alabama public
278 school.
279 b. Three thousand dollars ($3,000) per year, or one
280 thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per semester worked,
Page 10

thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per semester worked,
HB124 Enrolled
281 for a maximum of four consecutive years for a teacher with a
282 valid Alabama professional educator certificate endorsed in
283 computer science who graduated from a teacher education
284 program at an approved institution after the 2021 spring
285 semester term and is teaching in an Alabama public school.
286 c. Beginning after the 2022 spring semester, seven
287 thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per year, or three
288 thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($3,750) per semester
289 worked, for a maximum of four consecutive years for a teacher
290 with a valid Alabama professional educator certificate
291 endorsed in middle level or secondary math or science who
292 graduated from a teacher education program at an approved
293 institution after the 2018 spring semester term and is
294 teaching in an Alabama public school. Payments made under this
295 paragraph may only be made to eligible teachers who fulfilled
296 the per semester requirements for the 2022 fall semester and
297 forward.
298 (2)a. An additional two thousand five hundred dollars
299 ($2,500) per year, or one thousand two hundred fifty dollars
300 ($1,250) per semester worked, for a maximum of four
301 consecutive years for a teacher who satisfies all criteria
302 listed in Sections 16-5-54, 16-5-54.1, and 16-5-54.2, and who
303 also is teaching math or science in a public school in a
304 school system within the state with an acute teacher shortage
305 in math or science, or both, as identified by the commission
306 in consultation with the Alabama State Department of Education
307 or in a school that has been designated as a failing school,
308 or any other term adopted to identify an underperforming
Page 11

or any other term adopted to identify an underperforming
HB124 Enrolled
309 school by the Alabama State Board of Education or the
310 Legislature.
311 b. An additional one thousand dollars ($1,000) per
312 year, or five hundred dollars ($500) per semester worked, for
313 a maximum of four consecutive years for a teacher who
314 satisfies all criteria listed in Sections 16-5-54, 16-5-54.1,
315 and 16-5-54.2, and who also is teaching computer science in a
316 public school in a school system within the state with an
317 acute teacher shortage in computer science as identified by
318 the commission in consultation with the Alabama State
319 Department of Education or in a school that has been
320 designated as a failing school, or any other term adopted to
321 identify an underperforming school, by the Alabama State Board
322 of Education or the Legislature.
323 (b) Loan repayment award recipients shall reapply for
324 the program annually.
325 (a) Program funds shall be awarded and distributed by
326 the commission in the following manner:
327 (c)(1) Loan repayment assistance awards shall be
328 distributed directly to the recipient teacher eligible
329 applicants in two disbursements during the applicable year:
330 One disbursement shall be made after January 1 and the second
331 disbursement shall be made after June 1. Each recipient
332 eligible applicant shall provide documentation from the
333 employing public K-12 school or school system as proof that he
334 or she has taught for a of employment for the requested
335 semester. If the award amount is larger than exceeds the
336 outstanding loan balance, the award amount shall be reduced to
Page 12

outstanding loan balance, the award amount shall be reduced to
HB124 Enrolled
337 the amount of match the loan balance.
338 (d) The requirements of this article are contingent
339 upon available funding for the program.
340 (e)(2) The commission shall determine the necessary
341 procedures for awarding loan repayments assistance if the
342 number of total awards made to eligible applicants and
343 recipients exceeds available funding.
344 (f)(3) The recipient eligible applicant shall notify
345 the commission in writing of any change in status within 30
346 days after the change. Failure to notify the commission of a
347 change in status shall affect future eligibility. All of the
348 following constitute a change in status:
349 (1)a. A change in name.
350 (2)b. A change in residence.
351 (3)c. A change in employment status.
352 (g)(4) To receive a loan repayment check assistance
353 pursuant to this article, a teacher an eligible applicant
354 shall register online with the state Comptroller.
355 (b) The requirements of this article are contingent
356 upon available funding for the program.
357 (h)(c) A loan repayment check assistance award is
358 considered income by the Internal Revenue Service, and
359 recipients eligible applicants shall be made aware of that
360 fact.
361 (i) Any funds appropriated to the program shall be
362 nonreverting.
363 (j) Additional funds shall be made available to
364 teachers who also teach math, science, or computer science in
Page 13

teachers who also teach math, science, or computer science in
HB124 Enrolled
365 school systems of the state where the shortages of math,
366 science, or computer science teachers, or any combination of
367 the three, are most severe. The commission, in consultation
368 with the Alabama State Department of Education, shall
369 determine which school systems in the state have the greatest
370 shortage areas.
371 (k) A recipient who receives a loan repayment award and
372 continues to satisfy employment criteria shall continue to
373 receive an award for the four-year limit regardless of whether
374 the employing school system retains its acute shortage
375 designation or the employing school is removed from the
376 failing school list. If a recipient leaves an acute shortage
377 system or a failing school and accepts employment in a school
378 system or school that does not hold an acute shortage system
379 or failing school designation, the recipient shall no longer
380 qualify to receive supplemental funds.
381 (d) An eligible applicant who receives the base support
382 and continues to satisfy employment criteria shall continue to
383 receive an award for the four-year limit.
384 (e) An eligible applicant who receives the supplemental
385 support and continues to satisfy employment criteria shall
386 continue to receive an award for the four-year limit."
387 "§16-5-56
388 Any person individual or institution aggrieved by not
389 satisfied with the actions of the commission in its
390 administration of the program, by may submit a written
391 petition filed with to the commission within 30 days after
392 notice of the action complained of, may request a rehearing by
Page 14

notice of the action complained of, may request a rehearing by
HB124 Enrolled
393 the commission. If not satisfied with the response of the
394 commission to the written petition, the individual or
395 institution may request a rehearing within 20 days after the
396 response of the commission is made. The commission shall
397 schedule the requested rehearing not less than 20, nor more
398 than 30, within 20 days after receipt of the petition
399 rehearing request. The aggrieved party individual or
400 institution may present written and oral evidence supporting
401 its the petition and may be represented by counsel. The
402 decision of the commission following the rehearing shall be is
403 final."
404 Section 2. Sections 16-5-53.1 and16-5-53.2 are added to
405 the Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
406 §16-5-53.1
407 (a) The commission shall develop an accountability and
408 evaluation plan for the program that does all of the
409 following:
410 (1) Identifies the goals, objectives, and expected
411 outputs and outcomes of the program.
412 (2) Describes the specific activities of the program
413 and how those activities will achieve expected outcomes.
414 (3) Defines what the expected metrics of success shall
415 be and provides a monitoring plan to regularly assess
416 performance.
417 (4) Provides an evaluation plan to assess the impact of
418 expected outcomes.
419 (b) The commission shall consult with the Alabama
420 Commission on the Evaluation of Services on the development of
Page 15

Commission on the Evaluation of Services on the development of
HB124 Enrolled
421 the accountability and evaluation plan.
422 §16-5-53.2
423 Any eligible applicant who met the requirements of the
424 program and received a loan repayment prior to August 1, 2026,
425 shall remain eligible for loan repayments pursuant to the
426 requirements of the program as long as they remain
427 continuously employed with a qualifying school.
428 Section 3. Section 16-5-54.2, Code of Alabama 1975,
429 relating to documentation required from educators who received
430 their certifications pursuant to an alternative certification
431 program to receive loan repayments under AMSTEP, is repealed.
432 Section 4. This act shall become effective on August 1,
433 2026.
Page 16

2026.
HB124 Enrolled
434
435
436
437
438
439
440
441
442
443
444 ________________________________________________
445 Speaker of the House of Representatives
446
447
448
449 ________________________________________________
450 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
451
452
453 House of Representatives
454
455 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
456 was passed by the House 15-Jan-26.
457
458 John Treadwell
459 Clerk
460
461
462
463
464
465 Senate 10-Mar-26 Passed
466
467
468
Page 17